District of Columbia statutes.
26-713

Hearings.

Any administrative hearing held in accordance with this subchapter shall be held pursuant to Chapter 5 of Title 2, unless the Superintendent [Commissioner of the Department of Insurance, Securities, and Banking] determines that a public proceeding would jeopardize or adversely affect the safety and soundness of the bank or the public interest. If the Superintendent [Commissioner] makes the determination, the hearing may be held in private session.

Nov. 23, 1985, D.C. Law 6-63, § 10d
as added Aug. 17, 1991, D.C. Law 9-42, § 2(d), 38 DCR 4981
Because of the codification of D.C. Law 11-142 as subchapter II of Chapter 8 subchapter II of Chapter 7, 2001 Ed., and designation of the preexisting text as subchapter I, “subchapter” has been substituted for “chapter” in this section.
1981 Ed., § 26-812.